District of Columbia statutes.
44-109.02

Pre-admission medication management assessment.

Within 30 days prior to admission, the ALR shall consult with the prospective resident’s healthcare practitioner regarding:

(1)

The prospective resident’s current medication profile, including a review of nonprescription drugs;

(2)

Possible adverse interactions;

(3)

Common expected or unexpected side effects; and

(4)

The potential that such medications have to act as chemical restraints.

June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-127, § 902, 47 DCR 2647